Washington statutes.
RCW 33.40.060

Procedure to be as in receivership.

In any such liquidation proceeding, the court, except as otherwise in this title expressly provided, shall have the powers and proceed as in receivership proceedings.

[ 1945 c 235 s 107; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 3717-226. Prior: 1935 c 171 s 4; 1933 c 183 ss 70, 72, 73, 75, 76, 77, 78; 1919 c 169 s 13; 1913 c 110 s 20.]